vi: Loại thông điệp bên trong: Bên trong để trống; Thông điệp in tùy chỉnh; Điền vào chỗ trống; Thông điệp in sẵn bên trong; Khác
da: Type af indvendig besked: Blank indeni; Specialtrykt besked; Udfyld selv; Trykt besked indeni; Andet
fr: Type de message intérieur: Intérieur vierge; Message imprimé personnalisé; À remplir; Message imprimé à l’intérieur; Autre
pl: Typ wiadomości wewnątrz: Puste w środku; Własna wydrukowana wiadomość; Z miejscem do uzupełnienia; Wydrukowana wiadomość w środku; Inne
hr-HR: Vrsta unutarnje poruke: Prazno iznutra; Prilagođena ispisana poruka; Nadopunjavanje praznina; Ispisana poruka iznutra; Ostalo
tr: Eklenti mesaj türü: İçi boş; Özel basılı mesaj; Boşluk doldurmalı; İçinde basılı mesaj var; Diğer
sl-SI: Vrsta notranjega sporočila: Prazno znotraj; Natisnjeno sporočilo po meri; Izpolni prazna polja; Natisnjeno sporočilo znotraj; Drugo
hu: Belső üzenet típusa: Belül üres; Egyedi nyomtatott üzenet; Kitölthető; Nyomtatott üzenet belül; Egyéb
ro-RO: Tipul mesajului intern: Gol în interior; Mesaj tipărit personalizat; Completare a spațiilor goale; Mesaj tipărit în interior; Altele
de: Typ der Innennachricht: Innen blanko; Individuell gedruckte Nachricht; Lückentext; Gedruckte Nachricht innen; Sonstige
pt-BR: Mensagem interna tipo: Em branco por dentro; Mensagem impressa personalizada; Preencha as lacunas; Mensagem impressa por dentro; Outro
ko: 내부 메시지 유형: 내부 백지; 맞춤형 인쇄 메시지; 빈칸 채우기; 내부 인쇄 메시지; 기타
lt-LT: Vidinės žinutės tipas: Tuščias vidus; Pasirinktinis atspausdintas tekstas; Su tuščiomis vietomis įrašyti; Viduje atspausdintas tekstas; Kita
nb: Innvendig meldingstype: Blank inni; Spesialtrykt melding; Utfylling; Trykt melding inni; Annet
zh-TW: 內頁訊息類型: 內頁空白; 客製化印刷訊息; 填空; 內頁印刷訊息; 其他
bg-BG: Вид на съобщението от вътрешната страна: Празно отвътре; Персонализирано отпечатано съобщение; За попълване; Отпечатано съобщение отвътре; Други
cs: Typ sdělení uvnitř: Prázdné uvnitř; Vlastní tištěný vzkaz; S doplňováním; Tištěný vzkaz uvnitř; Jiné
pt-PT: Tipo de mensagem interna: Interior em branco; Mensagem impressa personalizada; Preencher os espaços em branco; Mensagem impressa no interior; Outro
el: Τύπος ενσωματωμένου μηνύματος: Κενό εσωτερικό; Προσαρμοσμένο εκτυπωμένο μήνυμα; Συμπλήρωσης κενών; Με εκτυπωμένο μήνυμα στο εσωτερικό; Άλλο
sk-SK: Typ odkazu vo vnútri: Vnútri prázdne; Vlastná vytlačená správa; Na doplnenie; Vytlačená správa vnútri; Iné
sv: Typ av internt meddelande: Tom insida; Anpassat tryckt meddelande; Fyll i själv; Tryckt meddelande på insidan; Övrigt
it: Tipo di messaggio interno: Interno bianco; Messaggio stampato personalizzato; Da compilare; Messaggio stampato all’interno; Altro
nl: Binnenbericht type: Blanco binnenkant; Aangepast gedrukt bericht; Invultekst; Gedrukt bericht aan de binnenkant; Overige
fi: Sisäisen viestin tyyppi: Sisältä tyhjä; Itse valittu painettu viesti; Täydennettävä tyhjä tila; Painettu viesti sisäpuolella; Muu
th: ประเภทข้อความภายใน: ด้านในว่างเปล่า; ข้อความพิมพ์ตามต้องการ; เติมคำในช่องว่าง; มีข้อความพิมพ์ด้านใน; อื่นๆ
en: Inside message type: Blank inside; Custom printed message; Fill-in-the-blank; Printed message inside; Other
ja: 内部メッセージタイプ: 中面は無地; カスタム印刷メッセージ; 穴埋め形式; 中面にメッセージ印刷あり; その他
es: Tipo de mensaje interno: Interior en blanco; Mensaje impreso personalizado; Espacio para rellenar; Mensaje impreso en el interior; Otro
ru: Тип внутреннего сообщения: Без текста внутри; Пользовательский печатный текст; Шаблон для заполнения; С печатным текстом внутри; Другое
zh-CN: 内部消息类型: 内页留白; 自定义印制寄语; 填空式; 内页印有寄语; 其他